th: ชุดไฟฉุกเฉิน: ไฟติดกระจังหน้า; ไลท์บาร์; ไม่รวมไฟฉุกเฉิน; ไฟรอบคัน/ไฟใต้ท้องรถ; ไฟเตือนด้านหลัง; ไฟส่องสว่างพื้นที่; ไฟติดที่บังแดด; อื่นๆ
nb: Nødbelysningspakke: Grillys; Lysbro; Ingen utrykningslys inkludert; Område-/understellsbelysning; Varsellys bak; Arbeidslys; Solskjermlys; Annet
it: Pacchetto di luci di emergenza: Luci per griglia; Barra luminosa; Nessuna luce di emergenza inclusa; Illuminazione perimetrale/sottoscocca; Luci di segnalazione posteriori; Luci di scena; Luci per aletta parasole; Altro
hr-HR: Paket rasvjete za hitne slučajeve: Svjetla na rešetki hladnjaka; Svjetlosna traka; Nisu uključena svjetla za hitne slučajeve; Perimetralna rasvjeta / rasvjeta podvozja; Stražnja svjetla upozorenja; Radna svjetla; Svjetla na sjenilu; Ostalo
tr: Acil durum aydınlatma paketi: Izgara lambaları; Tepe lambası; Acil durum lambası dahil değil; Çevre/araç altı aydınlatması; Arka uyarı lambaları; Olay yeri lambaları; Güneşlik lambaları; Diğer
fi: Hätävalaistuspaketti: Säleikkövalot; Valopaneeli; Ei sisällä hätävaloja; Ympäristö-/alustavalaistus; Takavaroitusvalot; Aluevalot; Häikäisysuojan valot; Muu
pt-PT: Pacote de iluminação de emergência: Luzes de grelha; Barra de luzes; Sem luzes de emergência incluídas; Iluminação perimetral/inferior; Luzes de aviso traseiras; Luzes de cena; Luzes de pala de sol; Outro
pt-BR: Pacote de iluminação de emergência: Luzes da grade; Barra de luzes; Nenhuma luz de emergência incluída; Iluminação de perímetro/sob a carroceria; Luzes de aviso traseiras; Luzes de cena; Luzes do quebra-sol; Outro
en: Emergency lighting package: Grille lights; Lightbar; No emergency lights included; Perimeter/underbody lighting; Rear warning lights; Scene lights; Visor lights; Other
fr: Ensemble d’éclairage d’urgence: Feux de calandre; Rampe lumineuse; Aucun feu de détresse inclus; Éclairage périphérique/de soubassement; Feux d’avertissement arrière; Projecteurs de zone; Feux de pare-soleil; Autre
sv: Nödbelysningspaket: Grillmonterade lampor; Ljusramp; Inga utryckningsljus ingår; Områdes-/underredesbelysning; Bakre varningsljus; Arbetsbelysning; Solskyddslampor; Annat
hu: Vészvilágítási csomag: Hűtőrácsra szerelt lámpák; Fényhíd; Megkülönböztető fényjelzést nem tartalmaz; Körvonal-/alvázvilágítás; Hátsó figyelmeztető lámpák; Munkaterület-megvilágító lámpák; Napellenzőre szerelt lámpák; Egyéb
el: Πακέτο φωτισμού έκτακτης ανάγκης: Φώτα μάσκας; Μπάρα φώτων; Δεν περιλαμβάνονται φώτα έκτακτης ανάγκης; Περιμετρικός φωτισμός/φωτισμός κάτω από το αμάξωμα; Πίσω προειδοποιητικά φώτα; Φώτα σκηνής; Φώτα σκιαδίου; Άλλο
da: Nødbelysningspakke: Kølergitterlygter; Lysbro; Ingen udrykningslygter inkluderet; Omkreds-/undervognsbelysning; Bagudvendte advarselslygter; Arbejdslygter; Solskærmslygter; Andet
zh-TW: 緊急警示燈套組: 水箱護罩車燈; 排燈; 不含緊急照明燈; 周邊/車底照明; 後方警示燈; 現場照明燈; 遮陽板車燈; 其他
ja: 非常用照明パッケージ: グリルライト; ライトバー; 緊急用ライトなし; ペリメーター/アンダーボディライト; リア警告灯; シーンライト; バイザーライト; その他
pl: Pakiet oświetlenia awaryjnego: Światła w grillu; Belka świetlna; Brak świateł ostrzegawczych w zestawie; Oświetlenie obwodowe / podwozia; Tylne światła ostrzegawcze; Oświetlenie strefy; Światła na osłonach przeciwsłonecznych; Inne
bg-BG: Пакет аварийно осветление: Светлини на решетката; Светлинна лента; Не са включени аварийни светлини; Периметърно осветление/осветление под купето; Задни предупредителни светлини; Светлини за местопроизшествие; Светлини на сенника; Други
es: Paquete de iluminación de emergencia: Luces de parrilla; Barra de luces; No incluye luces de emergencia; Iluminación perimetral/inferior; Luces de advertencia traseras; Luces de escena; Luces de visera; Otro
ko: 비상 조명 패키지: 그릴 라이트; 라이트바; 비상등 미포함; 차체 테두리/하부 조명; 후방 경고등; 씬 라이트; 바이저 라이트; 기타
nl: Noodverlichting pakket: Grilleverlichting; Lichtbalk; Geen zwaailichten inbegrepen; Omtrek-/bodemverlichting; Waarschuwingslichten achter; Omgevingsverlichting; Zonneklepverlichting; Overig
sk-SK: Balík núdzového osvetlenia: Svetlá na mriežke chladiča; Svetelná rampa; Bez núdzových svetiel; Osvetlenie obvodu/podvozka; Zadné výstražné svetlá; Osvetlenie priestoru; Svetlá na slnečnej clone; Iné
vi: Gói đèn chiếu sáng khẩn cấp: Đèn lưới tản nhiệt; Thanh đèn; Không bao gồm đèn khẩn cấp; Đèn chiếu sáng xung quanh/gầm xe; Đèn cảnh báo phía sau; Đèn chiếu sáng hiện trường; Đèn che nắng; Khác
zh-CN: 应急照明套装: 格栅灯; 长条灯; 不含应急灯; 周边/车底照明; 后部警示灯; 现场照明灯; 遮阳板灯; 其他
de: Notbeleuchtungspaket: Kühlergrill-Leuchten; Lichtbalken; Keine Warnleuchten enthalten; Umfeld-/Unterbodenbeleuchtung; Heckwarnleuchten; Umfeldbeleuchtung; Sonnenblenden-Leuchten; Sonstige
sl-SI: Paket zasilne razsvetljave: Luči na rešetki; Svetlobna letev; Intervencijske luči niso vključene; Osvetlitev oboda / podvozja; Zadnje opozorilne luči; Luči za osvetlitev okolice; Luči na senčniku; Drugo
lt-LT: Avarinio apšvietimo paketas: Grotelių švyturėliai; Švyturėlių sija; Avarinio apšvietimo nėra; Perimetro / dugno apšvietimas; Galiniai įspėjamieji švyturėliai; Aplinkos apšvietimas; Skydelių nuo saulės švyturėliai; Kita
ru: Комплект аварийного освещения: Огни в решетке радиатора; Световая панель; Без аварийного освещения; Освещение по периметру/днищу; Задние предупреждающие огни; Освещение рабочей зоны; Огни на солнцезащитных козырьках; Другое
ro-RO: Pachet de iluminat de urgență: Lumini pentru grilă; Rampă luminoasă; Nu sunt incluse lumini de urgență; Iluminat perimetral/sub caroserie; Lumini de avertizare spate; Lumini de perimetru (Scene lights); Lumini pentru parasolar; Altele
cs: Balíček nouzového osvětlení: Světla do masky chladiče; Světelná rampa; Bez nouzového osvětlení; Obvodové osvětlení / osvětlení podvozku; Zadní výstražná světla; Pracovní osvětlení; Světla na stínítko; Jiné